Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1802
Law enforcement activity; insurance required.

Each political subdivision shall self-insure or contract for insurance against liability for personal injuries or property damage that may be incurred by it or by its personnel as a result of law enforcement activity within or without its primary jurisdiction.

Laws 1994, LB 254, § 2.